test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adj-contracted_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted syllable adjectives belonging to FIINNIS, DEAHTIS, SMAVIS, STUORIS, NJALGGAT, CAPPIS, VIISSIS, RAHPIS, HARVVIS

Tests:
  Adj - fiinnis: # FIINNIS
    fiinnis+A+Attr: fiinna
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Gen: [fiidná, fiidnása]
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: fiidnás
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Ill: [fiidnái, fiidnásii]
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Com: [fiidnáin, fiidnásiin]
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: fiidnásiinna
    fiinnis+A+Pl+Com: [fiidnáiguin, fiidnásiiguin]
    fiinnis+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [fiidnábuid, fiidnásabbuid]
    fiinnis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [fiidnásebbuid, fiidnáseappuid]
    fiinnis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [fiidnásebbuid, fiidnáseappuid]
    fiinnis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Pl+Acc: [fiidnáseappuid]
    fiinnis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [fiidnáseappuid]
    fiinnis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: fiidnát
    fiinnis+A+Err/Orth+Der/AAdv+Adv: fiidnásit

  Adj - čoaskkis: # DEAHTIS
    čoaskkis+A+Attr: [čoaska, čoaskkes]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Gen: [čoaská, čoaskása]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: čoaskás
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Ill: [čoaskái, čoaskásii]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Com: [čoaskáin, čoaskásiin]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: čoaskásiinna
    čoaskkis+A+Pl+Com: [čoaskáiguin, čoaskásiiguin]
    čoaskkis+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [čoaskábuid, čoaskásabbuid]
    čoaskkis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [čoaskásebbuid, čoaskáseappuid]
    čoaskkis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [čoaskásebbuid, čoaskáseappuid]
    čoaskkis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Pl+Acc: čoaskáseappuid
    čoaskkis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: čoaskáseappuid
    čoaskkis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: čoaskát
    čoaskkis+A+Err/Orth+Der/AAdv+Adv: čoaskásit
    
  Adj - smávis: # SMAVIS
    smávis+A+Attr: smávva
    smávis+A+Sg+Gen: [smávvá, smávvása]
    smávis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: smávvás
    smávis+A+Sg+Ill: [smávvái, smávvásii]
    smávis+A+Sg+Com: [smávváin, smávvásiin]
    smávis+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: smávvásiinna
    smávis+A+Pl+Com: [smávváiguin, smávvásiiguin]
    smávis+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [smávvábuid, smávvásabbuid, smávibuid]
    smávis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [smávváseappuid, smávvásebbuid]
    smávis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [smávváseappuid, smávvásebbuid]
    smávis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Pl+Acc: smávváseappuid
    smávis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: smávváseappuid
    smávis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [smávvát, smávvásit]

  Adj - stuoris: # STUORIS
    stuoris+A+Attr: [stuorra, stuora]
    stuoris+A+Sg+Gen: stuorrá
    stuoris+A+Sg+Ill: stuorrái
    stuoris+A+Sg+Com: stuorráin
    stuoris+A+Pl+Com: stuorráiguin
    stuoris+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [stuoribuid, stuorábuid]
    stuoris+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: stuorabuid
    stuoris+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: stuorrát

  Adj - čáppat: # NJALGGAT
    čáppat+A+Attr: čáppa
    čáppat+Err/Orth+A+Attr: čábba
    čáppat+A+Sg+Gen: čábbá
    čáppat+A+Sg+Ill: čábbái
    čáppat+A+Sg+Com: čábbáin
    čáppat+A+Pl+Com: čábbáiguin
    čáppat+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [čábbábuid, čábbásabbuid, čábbáseappuid]
    čáppat+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: čábbásebbuid
    čáppat+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: čábbásebbuid
    čáppat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [čábbát, čábbásit]

  Adj - njálggis: # CAPPIS
    njálggis+A+Attr: njálgga
    njálggis+A+Sg+Gen: njálgá
    njálggis+A+Sg+Ill: njálgái
    njálggis+A+Sg+Com: njálgáin
    njálggis+A+Pl+Com: njálgáiguin
    njálggis+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [njálgábuid, njálgásabbuid]
    njálggis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [njálgásebbuid, njálgáseappuid]
    njálggis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [njálgásebbuid, njálgáseappuid]
    njálggis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: njálgát

  Adj - rikkis: # VIISSIS
    rikkis+A+Attr: rikkes
    rikkis+A+Err/Orth+Attr: rikkis
    rikkis+A+Sg+Gen: [riggá, riggása]
    rikkis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: riggás
    rikkis+A+Sg+Ill: [riggái, riggásii]
    rikkis+A+Sg+Com: [riggáin, riggásiin]
    rikkis+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: riggásiinna
    rikkis+A+Pl+Com: [riggáiguin, riggásiiguin]
    rikkis+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [riggábuid, riggásabbuid]
    rikkis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Pl+Acc: riggáseappuid
    rikkis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: riggáseappuid
    rikkis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [riggásebbuid, riggáseappuid]
    rikkis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [riggásebbuid, riggáseappuid]
    rikkis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: riggát
    rikkis+A+Err/Orth+Der/AAdv+Adv: riggásit

  Adj - ráhpis: # RAHPIS
    ráhpis+A+Attr: ráhpes
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Gen: [ráhppá, ráhppása]
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: ráhppás
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Ill: [ráhppái, ráhppásii]
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Com: [ráhppáin, ráhppásiin]
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: ráhppásiinna
    ráhpis+A+Pl+Com: [ráhppáiguin, ráhppásiiguin]
    ráhpis+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [ráhppábuid, ráhppásabbuid, ráhppáseappuid]
    ráhpis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: ráhppásebbuid
    ráhpis+A+Err/Orth+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: ráhppásebbuid
    ráhpis+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: ráhppásebbuid
    ráhpis+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: ráhppásebbuid
    ráhpis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ráhppát, ráhppásit]

  Adj - hárvvis: # HARVVIS
    hárvvis+A+Attr: hárve
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Gen: [hárvá, hárvása]
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: hárvás
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Ill: [hárvái, hárvásii]
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Com: hárvásiin
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: hárvásiinna
    hárvvis+A+Pl+Com: [hárváiguin, hárvásiiguin]
    hárvvis+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [hárvvibuid, hárvvibuid]
    hárvvis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [hárvvit, hárvásit]
